Utah statutes.
53A-11-502.   Identifying records -- Reporting requirements.
(1)  Upon notification by the division of a missing child in accordance with
Section 53-10-203, a school in which that child is currently or was previously
enrolled shall flag the record of that child in a manner that whenever a copy
of or information regarding the record is requested, the school is alerted to
the fact that the record is that of a missing child.
(2)  The school shall immediately report any request concerning flagged
records or knowledge as to the whereabouts of any missing child to the
division.
(3)  Upon notification by the division that a missing child has been
recovered, the school shall remove the flag from that child's record.
